Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1983 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and in 1983, 1994, and 2006 to make other, minor word changes under AS

01.05.031

.

Cross references. —

For temporary provisions providing immunity to certain persons from civil liability related to COVID-19, see secs. 13 and 15, ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

For a review of the sources of some of Alaska law, see Brown,

The Sources of the Alaska and Oregon Codes

(pts. 1 and 2), 2 UCLA-Alaska L. Rev. 15, 87 (1972-1973).